Washington statutes.
RCW 11.28.030

Community property—Who entitled to letters—Waiver.

A surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner shall be entitled to administer upon the community property, notwithstanding any provisions of the will to the contrary, if the court find such spouse or such domestic partner to be otherwise qualified; but if such surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner do not make application for such appointment within forty days immediately following the death of the deceased spouse or deceased domestic partner, he or she shall be considered as having waived his or her right to administer upon such community property. If any person, other than the surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner, make application for letters testamentary on such property, prior to the expiration of such forty days, then the court, before making any such appointment, shall require notice of such application to be given the said surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner, for such time and in such manner as the court may determine, unless such applicant show to the satisfaction of the court that there is no surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner or that he or she has in writing waived the right to administer upon such community property.

[ 2008 c 6 s 913; 1965 c 145 s 11.28.030. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 49; RRS s 1419.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—Severability—2008 c 6: See RCW 26.60.900 and 26.60.901.